Utah statutes.
78B-2-223.   Minority or disability prevents running of period.

Sections 78B-2-221 and 78B-2-222 shall not apply to minors or others under any legal disability to sue at the time when the right of action first accrues.  Section 78B-2-224 shall apply in those circumstances.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

